Utah statutes.
16-16-816.   Voting.

(1)  Each director shall have one vote for purposes of decisions made by the board of directors.

(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present at a meeting is required for action by the board of directors.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

